Hawaii statutes.
[§257-4] Penalties. (a) The fiduciary
organization shall establish a grievance committee and a procedure to hear,
review, and decide in writing any grievance made by an individual development
account holder who disputes a decision of the operating organization that a
withdrawal is subject to penalty.

(b) Each fiduciary organization shall
establish regulations as are necessary, including prohibiting eligibility for
further assistance under an individual development account project conducted
under this chapter, to ensure compliance with this chapter if an individual
participating in the individual development account project moves from the
community in which the project is conducted or is otherwise unable to continue
participating in the project. [L 1999, c 160, pt of §25]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next